Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0104.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 18223. (1) The department, in consultation with the board, shall promulgate rules requiring that to be granted a license under this part, except as provided in subsection (2), an individual must meet both of the following requirements: (a) Have been granted a doctoral degree in psychology, or a doctoral degree in a closely related field, from a doctoral degree program that meets all of the following requirements: (i) Is offered by a regionally accredited or other college, university, or institution approved by the board, and includes education and training appropriate to the practice of psychology. (ii) Has obtained the Association of State and Provincial Psychology Boards' national register designation, has been accredited by the American Psychological Association or the Canadian Psychological Association, or has obtained a similar designation from or been accredited by an entity approved by the board. However, a program that is in the process of obtaining the designation or becoming accredited as required in this subparagraph before August 1, 2011, and that obtains the designation or becomes accredited on or before August 31, 2020, meets the requirements of this subparagraph. (b) Have not less than 1 year of postdoctoral experience in the practice of psychology in an organized health care setting or other arrangement, as established by the board. (2) In Subject to section 18223a, in addition to section 16182, the board shall grant a limited license to an individual granted a master's degree in psychology from a regionally accredited college, or university, or institution approved by the board must be granted a limited license, if the individual has education, training, and experience appropriate to the practice of psychology, as established by the board. An individual who applies for an initial limited license under this subsection before March 31, 2018 is not required to take an examination that is approved by the board to be granted a limited license under this part if the individual was granted a master's degree in psychology after January 1, 2007 but before June 30, 2010 from the college, university, or institution described in this subsection, the individual has continuously held the temporary license described in this section since it was initially granted, by the board, and the disciplinary subcommittee has not imposed a sanction against the individual while holding the temporary license described in this section. Except for duties performed as an employee of a governmental entity or of a nonprofit organization serving benevolent and charitable purposes, the board shall place 2 limitations on a license granted to an individual under this subsection. The limitations must require supervision by a psychologist who has a license other than a limited license and must prohibit advertising or other representation to the public that will lead the public to believe the individual is engaging in the practice of psychology. A limited license granted under this subsection is renewable under part 161. An individual who is applying for a limited license under this subsection must have 1 year of supervised postgraduate experience in an organized health care setting or other arrangement, as established by the board. The individual postgraduate experience described in this subsection must be supervised by a psychologist who has a license other than a limited license, or if a psychologist who has a license other than a limited license is not available, by a psychologist who has at least a master's degree in psychology and at least 3 years of experience in the practice of psychology or by any other individual approved by the board. (3) The board shall grant a temporary license to an An individual described in subsection (2) must be granted a temporary license for the purpose of obtaining the 1 year of postgraduate experience described in that subsection. Beginning on March 31, 2018, a temporary license granted under this subsection is valid for 24 months and may be renewed for 1 additional 24-month term. If an individual described in subsection (2) was granted a temporary license by the board before March 31, 2018, his or her the individual's temporary license may be renewed for 1 additional 24-month term. (4) The board shall grant a temporary license to an An individual who is enrolled in a doctoral degree program that meets the requirements of subsection (1) must be granted a temporary license. Beginning on March 31, 2018, a temporary license granted under this subsection is valid for 24 months and may be renewed for 3 additional 24-month terms. If an individual enrolled in a doctoral program that meets the requirements of subsection (1) was granted a temporary license by the board before March 31, 2018, his or her the individual's temporary license may be renewed for 3 additional 24-month terms. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. 103 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.